Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB141.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 38 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Active duty combat" means performing the following services in the active
federal military of the United States:
1. Participation in an armed conflict;
2. Performance of a hazardous service relating to an armed conflict in a
foreign state; or
3. Performance of a duty through an instrumentality of war; and
(b) "Official declaration of war" means a declaration of war by the United
States Congress pursuant to Article 1, Section 8, Clause 11 of the
Constitution of the United States.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Kentucky
National Guard and any member of the Kentucky National Guard shall not be
released from the state into active duty combat unless the federal government has
satisfied any outstanding balance to the Kentucky National Guard, and the
United States Congress has:
(a) Passed an official declaration of war; or
(b) Taken official action pursuant to Article 1, Section 8, Clause 15 of the
Constitution of the United States to explicitly call forth the Kentucky
National Guard and any member of the Kentucky National Guard for
enumerated purposes to expressly execute the laws of the Commonwealth,
repel invasion, or suppress insurrection.
(3) Nothing in this section limits or prohibits the Governor from consenting to the
deployment of any Kentucky National Guard member as set forth in Title 32 of
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:47 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1114
the United States Code for defense in support of:
(a) Civil authority missions within the United States or its territories; or
(b) Border protection, for not more than thirty (30) days, when the governor of
a state or territory has declared an invasion.
Section 2. This Act may be cited as the Defend the Guard Act.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:47 PM Jacketed